test/src/morphology/N-gost'_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - гость M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: го́сть
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: го́стя
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: го́стя
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: го́сте
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: го́стю
      гость+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: го́стем
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: го́сти
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: госте́й
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: госте́й
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: гостя́х
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: гостя́м
      гость+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: гостя́ми
